Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 1 Strikes by Public Employees

45-19-1.
Definitions; right to express complaints or opinions not impaired.

As used in this article, the term:

“Public employee” means any person holding a position by appointment or employment in the government of this state or any person holding a position which provides essential public services without which the public health, safety, welfare, or morals would be endangered, by appointment or employment in the government of a county, municipality, school system, or other political subdivision of this state or in any agency, authority, board, commission, or public institution of this state or political subdivision thereof.

“Public employment” means the appointment or employment in the government of this state or the government of a county, municipality, school system, or other political subdivision of this state or in any agency, authority, board, commission, or public institution of this state or political subdivision thereof.

“Strike” means the failure to report for duty, the willful absence from one’s position, the stoppage or deliberate slowing down of work, or the withholding in whole or in part of the full, faithful, and proper performance of the duties of employment for the purpose of inducing, influencing, or coercing a change in the conditions, compensation, rights, privileges, or obligations of public employment; provided, however, that nothing in this article shall limit or impair the right of any public employee to express or communicate a complaint or opinion on any matter related to the conditions of public employment so long as the same is not designed to and does not interfere with the full, faithful, and proper performance of the duties of employment.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 459, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1155, § 1.

Law reviews.

For review of 1998 legislation relating to public officers and employees, see 15 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 201 (1998).

45-19-2.
Public employees not to promote, participate in, or encourage strikes.

No public employee shall promote, encourage, or participate in any strike; provided, however, that no right to collective bargaining currently recognized by law is abridged by this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 459, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1155, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 45.

Law reviews.

For article discussing right of Georgia state employees to participate in strikes, see 4 Ga. L. Rev. 110 (1969).

45-19-3.
Supervising personnel not to authorize, approve, or consent to strikes.

No person exercising any authority, supervision, or direction over any public employee shall have the power to authorize, approve, or consent to a strike by one or more public employees; and such person shall not authorize, approve, or consent to such a strike.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 459, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1155, § 1.

Cross references.

Prohibition against work stoppages, slowdowns, or strikes by municipal firefighters, §

25-5-12

.

Law reviews.

For article discussing right of Georgia state employees to participate in strikes, see 4 Ga. L. Rev. 110 (1969).

45-19-4.
Termination of employment, forfeiture of civil service status, job rights, seniority, and emoluments upon violation of Code Section 45-19-2; eligibility of employee for reappointment.

Any public employee who violates Code Section 45-19-2 shall be deemed to have terminated his or her employment; shall forfeit his or her civil service status, job rights, seniority, and emoluments, if any; and subsequent to such violation shall not be eligible for appointment or reappointment or employment or reemployment in public employment for a period of three years after such violation except upon the following conditions:

His or her direct or indirect compensation shall in no event exceed that received by him or her immediately prior to the time of such violation;

His or her direct or indirect compensation shall not be increased for three years after such subsequent appointment or reappointment or employment or reemployment; and

He or she shall be on probation for a period of five years following such appointment or reappointment or employment or reemployment, during which period he or she shall serve without tenure and at the pleasure of the appointing or employing officer or body.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 459, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1155, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article discussing right of Georgia state employees to participate in strikes, see 4 Ga. L. Rev. 110 (1969).

45-19-5.
Action by person not a public employee to encourage strike.

Any person who is not a public employee and who shall knowingly incite, agitate, influence, coerce, persuade, or picket to urge a public employee to strike shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment not to exceed one year, or by a fine of not less than $100.00 nor more than $1,000.00, or both.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 459, § 4; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1155, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article discussing right of Georgia state employees to participate in strikes, see 4 Ga. L. Rev. 110 (1969).